Massachusetts, session 194th, H4094.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. With respect to each qualifying parcel of real property classified as class
one, residential according to the classification by the Board of Assessors for the town of Milton
(a “Qualifying Parcel”) there shall be a senior, means-tested exemption from the property tax
otherwise payable with respect to such Qualifying Parcel in an amount to be determined annually
by the Select Board as described herein. For the purposes of this special act, a Qualifying Parcel
shall be a unit of real property as defined by the Board of Assessors under the deed for the
property as residential class one and includes a condominium unit. The exemption provided for
herein shall be in addition to any and all other exemptions allowed by the General Laws.
SECTION 2. A taxpayer shall qualify for the exemption provided for herein only if all of
the following criteria are met:
of 3

a. The Qualifying Parcel is owned and occupied by one or more natural persons who
applied for and received the circuit breaker income tax credit the previous calendar year under
section 6(k) of chapter 62 of the General Laws;
b. The Qualifying Parcel is owned by: (i) a single taxpayer age 65 or older; or (ii)
jointly by one or more taxpayers so long as one owner is age 65 or older and all other owners are
age 60 or older in each case as determined as of December 31st of the previous calendar year;
c. The Qualifying Parcel is the domicile of the taxpayer(s);
d. The applicant taxpayer (or at least one of the joint applicants) has been domiciled
and owned a residential unit of real property in the town of Milton for at least ten (10)
consecutive years prior to filing an application for this exemption;
e. The maximum assessed value of the domicile is no greater than the prior fiscal
year’s maximum assessed value for qualification for the circuit breaker income tax credit under
Section 6(k) of chapter 62 of the General Laws as adjusted annually by the Department of
Revenue;
f. Property taxes shall not be reduced by more than 50 percent by this exemption;
and
g. The Board of Assessors has approved the application. The Board of Assessors
may deny an application if they find the applicant has excessive assets that place them outside of
the intended recipients of the senior exemption created by this act. The Board of Assessors shall
adopt a policy for approvals and denials of applications.
of 3

SECTION 3. The Select Board shall set the exemption amount provided for in section 1,
provided that the amount of the exemption shall be within a range of 50 percent to 100 percent of
the amount of the circuit breaker income tax credit under section 6(k) of chapter 62 of the
General Laws which the applicant received in the previous year. The total amount exempted by
this act shall be allocated proportionally within the tax levy on all taxpayers and/or shall be
funded by an appropriation or transfer from existing funds and shall not exceed 1% of the
municipality’s tax Levy.
SECTION 4. A person who seeks to qualify for the exemption under section 1 shall,
before the deadline established by the Board of Assessors, file an application, on a form to be
adopted by the Board of Assessors, with the supporting documentation of the applicant’s income
and assets as described in the application including a copy of the filed income tax return of the
applicant showing the Circuit Breaker tax credit. The application shall be filed each year for
which the applicant seeks the exemption.
SECTION 5. No exemption shall be granted under this act until the Department of
Revenue certifies a tax rate for the applicable tax year where the total exemption amount is
raised by a burden shift within the tax levy and/or by an appropriation or transfer from existing
funds.
of 3